District of Columbia statutes.
47-2884.17

Rules and regulations.

The Mayor, pursuant to [Chapter 5 of Title 2, § 2-501 et seq.], may issue rules to implement the provisions of this part.

History

Aug. 6, 1956, 70 Stat. 1043, ch. 970, § 17
Mar. 12, 2011, D.C. Law 18-315, § 4(e), 57 DCR 12412
Sept. 26, 2012, D.C. Law 19-171, §§ 122, 302, 59 DCR 6190
Dec. 24, 2013, D.C. Law 20-61, § 7158(e), 60 DCR 12472

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 2-1917.
1973 Ed., § 2-2017.

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-315 rewrote the section, which formerly read:
“The Council of the District of Columbia is authorized to make, and the Mayor of the District of Columbia is authorized to enforce, such rules and regulations as the Council deems necessary to carry out the purposes of this part.”
D.C. Law 19-171 enacted this subchapter into law; and substituted “this part” for “this act.”
The 2013 amendment by D.C. Law 20-61 substituted “this part” for “this act”.

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7158(e) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-130, July 30, 2013, 60 DCR 11384, 20 DCSTAT 1827).
For temporary (90 days) amendment of this section, see § 7158(e) of the Fiscal Year 2014 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2013 (D.C. Act 20-204, October 17, 2013, 60 DCR 15341, 20 DCSTAT 2311).

Short Title

Section 7151 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that Subtitle O of Title VII of the act may be cited as the “Tax Clarification Amendment Act of 2013”.

Editor's Notes

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-61: Section 11001 of D.C. Law 20-61 provided that, except as otherwise provided, the act shall apply as of October 1, 2013.

Change in Government

This section originated at a time when local government powers were delegated to a Board of Commissioners of the District of Columbia (see Acts Relating to the Establishment of the District of Columbia and its Various Forms of Governmental Organization in Volume 1). Section 402(73) of Reorganization Plan No. 3 of 1967 (see Reorganization Plans in Volume 1) transferred all of the functions of the Board of Commissioners under this section to the District of Columbia Council, subject to the right of the Commissioner as provided in § 406 of the Plan. The District of Columbia Self-Government and Governmental Reorganization Act, 87 Stat. 818, § 711 ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.11), abolished the District of Columbia Council and the Office of Commissioner of the District of Columbia. These branches of government were replaced by the Council of the District of Columbia and the Office of Mayor of the District of Columbia, respectively. Accordingly, and also pursuant to § 714(a) of such Act ( D.C. Code, § 1-207.14(a)), appropriate changes in terminology were made in this section.